scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/adj.lexd
бāфзол<adj>:способный<adj>
bāql<adj>:умный<adj>
бāқл<adj>:умный<adj>
babarakat<adj>:благодатный<adj>
бабаракат<adj>:благодатный<adj>
bobarakat<adj>:благодатный<adj>
бобаракат<adj>:благодатный<adj>
bobarokat<adj>:благодатный<adj>
бобарокат<adj>:благодатный<adj>
ba-wazm<adj>:выдержанный<adj>
ба-wазм<adj>:выдержанный<adj>
ba-wazn<adj>:выдержанный<adj>
ба-wазн<adj>:выдержанный<adj>
ba-wafo<adj>:верный<adj>
ба-wафо<adj>:верный<adj>
ba-wux̌<adj>:сознательный<adj>
ба-wух̌<adj>:сознательный<adj>
ba-ux̌<adj>:сознательный<adj>
ба-ух̌<adj>:сознательный<adj>
ba-wux̌<adj>:в_сознании<adj>
ба-wух̌<adj>:в_сознании<adj>
ba-ux̌<adj>:в_сознании<adj>
ба-ух̌<adj>:в_сознании<adj>
ba-gandagi<adj>:плохой<adj>
ба-гандаги<adj>:плохой<adj>
ba-gandi<adj>:плохой<adj>
ба-ганди<adj>:плохой<adj>
bad<adj>:плохой<adj>
бад<adj>:плохой<adj>
ba-dawlat<adj>:богатый<adj>
ба-даwлат<adj>:богатый<adj>
badam<adj>:сильный<adj>
бадам<adj>:сильный<adj>
badandex̌<adj>:злонамеренный<adj>
бадандех̌<adj>:злонамеренный<adj>
badaxloq<adj>:дурного_поведения<adj>
бадахлоқ<adj>:дурного_поведения<adj>
badax̌xi<adj>:бадахшанский<adj>
бадах̌хи<adj>:бадахшанский<adj>
badbaxt<adj>:несчастный<adj>
бадбахт<adj>:несчастный<adj>
badbaxt<adj>:хитрый<adj>
бадбахт<adj>:хитрый<adj>
badbašar<adj>:уродливый<adj>
бадбашар<adj>:уродливый<adj>
badbůy<adj>:вонючий<adj>
бадбу̊й<adj>:вонючий<adj>
badwoymā<adj>:уродливый<adj>
бадwоймā<adj>:уродливый<adj>
badgīr<adj>:строптивая<adj>
бадгӣр<adj>:строптивая<adj>
badgimůn<adj>:мнительный<adj>
бадгиму̊н<adj>:мнительный<adj>
badgumůn<adj>:мнительный<adj>
бадгуму̊н<adj>:мнительный<adj>
baddil<adj>:зловредный<adj>
баддил<adj>:зловредный<adj>
bad-zorð<adj>:ревнивый<adj>
бад-зорδ<adj>:ревнивый<adj>
baӡot<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
баӡот<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
bad-lāfč<adj>:с_некрасивыми_губами<adj>
бад-лāфч<adj>:с_некрасивыми_губами<adj>
badmiǰoz<adj>:грубый<adj>
бадмиҷоз<adj>:грубый<adj>
badmůmilā<adj>:грубый<adj>
бадму̊милā<adj>:грубый<adj>
бадмӯ̊милā+?<adj>:грубый<adj>
бадмӯ̊милā<adj>:грубый<adj>
badnamo<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
баднамо<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
badnāfc<adj>:прожорливый<adj>
баднāфц<adj>:прожорливый<adj>
badnafc<adj>:прожорливый<adj>
баднафц<adj>:прожорливый<adj>
badnoz<adj>:кокетливый<adj>
бадноз<adj>:кокетливый<adj>
badnům<adj>:имеющий_дурную_славу<adj>
бадну̊м<adj>:имеющий_дурную_славу<adj>
ba-dox̌t<adj>:прочный<adj>
ба-дох̌т<adj>:прочный<adj>
badrāg<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бадрāг<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
badrag<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бадраг<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
badrūy<adj>:с_некрасивым_лицом<adj>
бадрӯй<adj>:с_некрасивым_лицом<adj>
badsifat<adj>:недоброкачественный<adj>
бадсифат<adj>:недоброкачественный<adj>
badsoxt<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
бадсохт<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
badsūrat<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
бадсӯрат<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
badtoyifā<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
бадтойифā<adj>:неблагородный<adj>
badfêl<adj>:норовистый<adj>
бадфêл<adj>:норовистый<adj>
badfêl<adj>:непослушный<adj>
бадфêл<adj>:непослушный<adj>
badfaol<adj>:капризный<adj>
бадфаол<adj>:капризный<adj>
badfuol<adj>:капризный<adj>
бадфуол<adj>:капризный<adj>
badxašm<adj>:гневный<adj>
бадхашм<adj>:гневный<adj>
badxati<adj>:черновой<adj>
бадхати<adj>:черновой<adj>
badxur<adj>:отвратительный_на_вкус<adj>
бадхур<adj>:отвратительный_на_вкус<adj>
badxůn<adj>:слабый<adj>
бадху̊н<adj>:слабый<adj>
badӡow<adj>:неудобный_для_жатвы<adj>
бадӡоw<adj>:неудобный_для_жатвы<adj>
badčax̌m<adj>:зловредный<adj>
бадчах̌м<adj>:зловредный<adj>
badšakli<adj>:безобразный<adj>
бадшакли<adj>:безобразный<adj>
badqār<adj>:злой<adj>
бадқāр<adj>:злой<adj>
batqār<adj>:злой<adj>
батқāр<adj>:злой<adj>
badǰāl<adj>:злобный<adj>
бадҷāл<adj>:злобный<adj>
bazarb<adj>:сильный<adj>
базарб<adj>:сильный<adj>
bazdal<adj>:запутанный<adj>
баздал<adj>:запутанный<adj>
ba-zeb<adj>:красивый<adj>
ба-зеб<adj>:красивый<adj>
bazūr<adj>:принудительный<adj>
базӯр<adj>:принудительный<adj>
ba-aybat<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ба-айбат<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ba-ebat<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ба-ебат<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ba-yebat<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ба-йебат<adj>:внушительный<adj>
ba-ibo<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
ба-ибо<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
ba-yibo<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
ба-йибо<adj>:стыдливый<adj>
baynulmilali<adj>:интернациональный<adj>
байнулмилали<adj>:интернациональный<adj>
baynulmillali<adj>:интернациональный<adj>
байнулмиллали<adj>:интернациональный<adj>
baynalxalqi<adj>:международный<adj>
байналхалқи<adj>:международный<adj>
baynulxalqi<adj>:международный<adj>
байнулхалқи<adj>:международный<adj>
bakal<adj>:годовалая<adj>
бакал<adj>:годовалая<adj>
bakor<adj>:необходимый<adj>
бакор<adj>:необходимый<adj>
bakori<adj>:необходимый<adj>
бакори<adj>:необходимый<adj>
balad<adj>:знакомый<adj>
балад<adj>:знакомый<adj>
balamuč<adj>:упитанный<adj>
баламуч<adj>:упитанный<adj>
baland<adj>:высокий<adj>
баланд<adj>:высокий<adj>
bilānd<adj>:высокий<adj>
билāнд<adj>:высокий<adj>
biland<adj>:высокий<adj>
биланд<adj>:высокий<adj>
baland<adj>:громкий<adj>
баланд<adj>:громкий<adj>
bilānd<adj>:громкий<adj>
билāнд<adj>:громкий<adj>
biland<adj>:громкий<adj>
биланд<adj>:громкий<adj>
balandpoyā<adj>:с_высокими_ножками<adj>
баландпойā<adj>:с_высокими_ножками<adj>
balanpoyā<adj>:с_высокими_ножками<adj>
баланпойā<adj>:с_высокими_ножками<adj>
baland-pox̌nā<adj>:на_высоких_каблуках<adj>
баланд-пох̌нā<adj>:на_высоких_каблуках<adj>
bilānd-pox̌nā<adj>:на_высоких_каблуках<adj>
билāнд-пох̌нā<adj>:на_высоких_каблуках<adj>
balan-qād<adj>:рослый<adj>
балан-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
balan-qad<adj>:рослый<adj>
балан-қад<adj>:рослый<adj>
baland-qād<adj>:рослый<adj>
баланд-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
baland-qad<adj>:рослый<adj>
баланд-қад<adj>:рослый<adj>
bilān-qād<adj>:рослый<adj>
билāн-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
bilānd-qād<adj>:рослый<adj>
билāнд-қāд<adj>:рослый<adj>
balan-qůmat<adj>:высокий<adj>
балан-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
baland-qůmat<adj>:высокий<adj>
баланд-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
bilān-qůmat<adj>:высокий<adj>
билāн-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
bilānd-qůmat<adj>:высокий<adj>
билāнд-қу̊мат<adj>:высокий<adj>
badǰalūbat<adj>:страшный<adj>
бадҷалӯбат<adj>:страшный<adj>
balaǰūbat<adj>:страшный<adj>
балаҷӯбат<adj>:страшный<adj>
balo<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
бало<adj>:некрасивый<adj>
balo<adj>:хитрый<adj>
бало<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ba-mazā<adj>:вкусный<adj>
ба-мазā<adj>:вкусный<adj>
ba-mêr<adj>:добросердечный<adj>
ба-мêр<adj>:добросердечный<adj>
band<adj>:арестованный<adj>
банд<adj>:арестованный<adj>
band<adj>:загнанный<adj>
банд<adj>:загнанный<adj>
baori<adj>:весенний<adj>
баори<adj>:весенний<adj>
bori<adj>:весенний<adj>
бори<adj>:весенний<adj>
buori<adj>:весенний<adj>
буори<adj>:весенний<adj>
baornůnǰ<adj>:весенний<adj>
баорну̊нҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
baornīnč<adj>:весенний<adj>
баорнӣнч<adj>:весенний<adj>
baorůnǰ<adj>:весенний<adj>
баору̊нҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
borīnǰ<adj>:весенний<adj>
борӣнҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
buornůnǰ<adj>:весенний<adj>
буорну̊нҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
buorīnǰ<adj>:весенний<adj>
буорӣнҷ<adj>:весенний<adj>
ba-rawax̌<adj>:удобный<adj>
ба-раwах̌<adj>:удобный<adj>
ba-rawix̌<adj>:удобный<adj>
ба-раwих̌<adj>:удобный<adj>
ba-rawax̌<adj>:толковый<adj>
ба-раwах̌<adj>:толковый<adj>
ba-rawix̌<adj>:толковый<adj>
ба-раwих̌<adj>:толковый<adj>
ba-rawax̌-rāng<adj>:более_или_менее_удобный<adj>
ба-раwах̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_удобный<adj>
ba-rawix̌-rāng<adj>:более_или_менее_удобный<adj>
ба-раwих̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_удобный<adj>
ba-rawax̌-rāng<adj>:более_или_менее_надежный<adj>
ба-раwах̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_надежный<adj>
ba-rawix̌-rāng<adj>:более_или_менее_надежный<adj>
ба-раwих̌-рāнг<adj>:более_или_менее_надежный<adj>
barakatdor<adj>:удачливый<adj>
баракатдор<adj>:удачливый<adj>
barakat-yoftā<adj>:удачливый<adj>
баракат-йофтā<adj>:удачливый<adj>
bar-allo<adj>:известный<adj>
бар-алло<adj>:известный<adj>
baraot<adj>:удобный<adj>
бараот<adj>:удобный<adj>
barahot<adj>:удобный<adj>
бараҳот<adj>:удобный<adj>
baraot<adj>:обеспеченный<adj>
бараот<adj>:обеспеченный<adj>
barahot<adj>:обеспеченный<adj>
бараҳот<adj>:обеспеченный<adj>
barwaxt<adj>:ранний<adj>
барwахт<adj>:ранний<adj>
barwaqt<adj>:ранний<adj>
барwақт<adj>:ранний<adj>
barwêzi<adj>:барвазский<adj>
барwêзи<adj>:барвазский<adj>
bar-dam<adj>:здоровый<adj>
бар-дам<adj>:здоровый<adj>
bar-dirůɣ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-диру̊ғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
bar-dirūɣ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-дирӯғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
bar-durůɣ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-дуру̊ғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
bar-durūɣ<adj>:лживый<adj>
бар-дурӯғ<adj>:лживый<adj>
barzīnak<adj>:обкрученный<adj>
барзӣнак<adj>:обкрученный<adj>
barzīnak<adj>:запутанный<adj>
барзӣнак<adj>:запутанный<adj>
ba-rawoǰ<adj>:допустимый<adj>
ба-раwоҷ<adj>:допустимый<adj>
ba-riwoǰ<adj>:допустимый<adj>
ба-риwоҷ<adj>:допустимый<adj>
barobar<adj>:равный<adj>
баробар<adj>:равный<adj>
barobar<adj>:ровный<adj>
баробар<adj>:ровный<adj>
barosti<adj>:правильный<adj>
барости<adj>:правильный<adj>
bartangi<adj>:бартангский<adj>
бартанги<adj>:бартангский<adj>
bar-têpčak<adj>:закрученный<adj>
бар-тêпчак<adj>:закрученный<adj>
ba-samar<adj>:зрелый<adj>
ба-самар<adj>:зрелый<adj>
ba-salêqā<adj>:способный<adj>
ба-салêқā<adj>:способный<adj>
ba-silêqā<adj>:способный<adj>
ба-силêқā<adj>:способный<adj>
ba-somůn<adj>:спокойный<adj>
ба-сому̊н<adj>:спокойный<adj>
ba-tartīb<adj>:аккуратный<adj>
ба-тартӣб<adj>:аккуратный<adj>
ba-tiɣyůn<adj>:рослый<adj>
ба-тиғйу̊н<adj>:рослый<adj>
ba-tuɣyůn<adj>:рослый<adj>
ба-туғйу̊н<adj>:рослый<adj>
ba-fām<adj>:рассудительный<adj>
ба-фāм<adj>:рассудительный<adj>
ba-fānd<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ба-фāнд<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ba-fireb<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ба-фиреб<adj>:хитрый<adj>
ba-firix̌tā<adj>:спокойный<adj>
ба-фирих̌тā<adj>:спокойный<adj>
baxil<adj>:скупой<adj>
бахил<adj>:скупой<adj>
baxmalin<adj>:бархатный<adj>
бахмалин<adj>:бархатный<adj>
baxtdor<adj>:счастливый<adj>
бахтдор<adj>:счастливый<adj>
bačagůna<adj>:детский<adj>
бачагу̊на<adj>:детский<adj>
bačador<adj>:имеющий_детей<adj>
бачадор<adj>:имеющий_детей<adj>
bašānd<adj>:хороший<adj>
башāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
baššānd<adj>:хороший<adj>
башшāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
bašānd<adj>:хороший<adj>
башāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
baššānd<adj>:хороший<adj>
башшāнд<adj>:хороший<adj>
bašānd<adj>:красивый<adj>
башāнд<adj>:красивый<adj>
baššānd<adj>:красивый<adj>
башшāнд<adj>:красивый<adj>
baɣīt<adj>:завистливый<adj>
бағӣт<adj>:завистливый<adj>
ba-quwat<adj>:дюжий<adj>
ба-қуwат<adj>:дюжий<adj>
ba-quwat<adj>:питательный<adj>
ба-қуwат<adj>:питательный<adj>
ba-ǰafo<adj>:недоедающий<adj>
ба-ҷафо<adj>:недоедающий<adj>
bāð<adj>:зловредный<adj>
бāδ<adj>:зловредный<adj>
bāð<adj>:бодливый<adj>
бāδ<adj>:бодливый<adj>
bāč-kāčdor<adj>:семейный<adj>
бāч-кāчдор<adj>:семейный<adj>
beabri<adj>:безоблачный<adj>
беабри<adj>:безоблачный<adj>
beawoz<adj>:беззвучный<adj>
беаwоз<adj>:беззвучный<adj>
beād<adj>:безграничный<adj>
беāд<adj>:безграничный<adj>
bead<adj>:безграничный<adj>
беад<adj>:безграничный<adj>
beadab<adj>:невежливый<adj>
беадаб<adj>:невежливый<adj>
beadad<adj>:бесчисленный<adj>
беадад<adj>:бесчисленный<adj>
beadolat<adj>:несправедливый<adj>
беадолат<adj>:несправедливый<adj>
beayb<adj>:безгрешный<adj>
беайб<adj>:безгрешный<adj>
beamdod<adj>:беззащитный<adj>
беамдод<adj>:беззащитный<adj>
beimdod<adj>:беззащитный<adj>
беимдод<adj>:беззащитный<adj>
beāmiyat<adj>:несущественный<adj>
беāмийат<adj>:несущественный<adj>
beamiyat<adj>:несущественный<adj>
беамийат<adj>:несущественный<adj>
be-angix̌t<adj>:беспалый<adj>
бе-ангих̌т<adj>:беспалый<adj>
be-ingax̌t<adj>:беспалый<adj>
бе-ингах̌т<adj>:беспалый<adj>
be-andex̌ā<adj>:необдуманный<adj>
бе-андех̌ā<adj>:необдуманный<adj>
beandozā<adj>:безмерный<adj>
беандозā<adj>:безмерный<adj>
beasliā<adj>:безоружный<adj>
беаслиā<adj>:безоружный<adj>
beasliyā<adj>:безоружный<adj>
беаслийā<adj>:безоружный<adj>
beasos<adj>:необоснованный<adj>
беасос<adj>:необоснованный<adj>
beatyot<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
беатйот<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
beetyot<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
беетйот<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
betyot<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
бетйот<adj>:неосторожный<adj>
beātibor<adj>:не_заслуживающий_доверия<adj>
беāтибор<adj>:не_заслуживающий_доверия<adj>
bebārā<adj>:не_дающий_плодов<adj>
бебāрā<adj>:не_дающий_плодов<adj>
bebirūt<adj>:безусый<adj>
бебирӯт<adj>:безусый<adj>
